Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-708
Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund; Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund shall be used by the Revisor of Statutes to perform the duties required by subdivision (4) of section 49-702 and section 49-704, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

The Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund shall be used by the Clerk of the Legislature to perform the duties required by such section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2012, LB576, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 16.
January 1, 2027
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.